Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.020

Scope.

(1) This chapter governs arbitration of a family law dispute.

(2) This chapter does not authorize an arbitrator to make an award that:

(a) Grants a legal separation or dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, or annulment;

(b) Terminates parental rights;

(c) Grants an adoption or a guardianship of a child or incapacitated individual; or

(d) Determines the status of dependency.

(3) This chapter does not apply to:

(a) Any arbitration governed by chapter 7.06 RCW;

(b) Proceedings under Title 13 RCW;

(c) Jurisdictional determinations under chapter 26.27 RCW;

(d) Proceedings under RCW 26.26A.465;

(e) Writs of habeas corpus;

(f) Disputes as to personal or subject matter jurisdiction;

(g) Determination of venue;

(h) Issuance, modification, or termination of protection orders under chapter 7.105 RCW; and

(i) Delegation of the court's authority to permanently modify a parenting plan based on a finding of substantial change in circumstances.

[ 2023 c 61 s 3.]